Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STILLWATER VETERANS MEMORIAL.new text end new text begin $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Stillwater Veterans Memorial to expand the memorial to veterans of the United States armed forces at Stillwater Veterans Memorial in the city of Stillwater. new text end